Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,295
Miscellaneous claim, defined.

As used in the State Miscellaneous Claims Act, miscellaneous claim shall mean any claim against the state for which there is no other specific provision of law for the resolution of such claim.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 45.